Utah statutes.
72-4-132.   State highways -- SR-261, SR-262, SR-264 to SR-266, and SR-268
to SR-270.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-261.  From Route 163 north of Mexican Hat to Route 95 east of Natural
Bridges National Monument.
(2)  SR-262.  From Route 191 approximately 11 miles north of Bluff easterly
and southerly to Route 162 in Montezuma Creek.
(3)  SR-264.  From Route 31 easterly through Flat Canyon and Eccles Canyon to
Route 96 south of Scofield.
(4)  SR-265.  From Route 114 near Twelfth South Street in Orem southeasterly
to Route 189 in Provo.
(5)  SR-266.  From Route 215 easterly on Forty-seventh South Street and Forty-
fifth South Street to Route 215.
(6)  SR-268.  From Route 15 easterly on 600 North Street to Route 89 in Salt
Lake City.
(7)  SR-269.  From Route 15 easterly on Fifth and Sixth South Streets to Route
89 in Salt Lake City, providing one-way couplets.
(8)  SR-270.  From 900 South northerly on West Temple Street to Route 89 in
Salt Lake City.
